New York, session 2025-2026, S10022.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of section 490 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (iv) to read 3 as follows: 4 (iv) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for purposes of 5 establishing proof of identity for the issuance of a non-driver iden- 6 tification card under this article, a confirmation of trafficking victim 7 status issued by the office of temporary and disability assistance 8 pursuant to section four hundred eighty-three-bb of the social services 9 law shall be accepted as a form of evidence of identity. The commis- 10 sioner may determine the extent to which such confirmation satisfies the 11 identification requirements established by the department. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15274-02-6